Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2212
Separate investment account.

A separate investment account shall not be chargeable with any liabilities arising out of any other separate investment account or any other business of the company which has no specific and determinable relation to or dependence upon such separate account. Any surplus or deficit which may arise in any separate account by virtue of mortality experience guaranteed by the company or by expense costs shall be adjusted by withdrawals from or additions to such separate account so that the assets of such account shall equal the liabilities.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 12, p. 1264.